District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.41

Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the articles of incorporation or bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the articles and bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720